nb: Gymnastikkdisiplin: Akrobatikk; Luftakrobatikk; Aerobic; Turn; Cheerleading; Generell trening; Rytmisk; Trampoline; Tumbling; Annet
sk-SK: Gymnastická disciplína: Akrobatická; Vzdušná; Aerobik; Športová; Roztlieskavanie; Všeobecný tréning; Moderná; Skoky na trampolíne; Tumbling; Iné
es: Disciplina de gimnasia: Acrobática; Aérea; Aeróbica; Artística; Animación; Entrenamiento general; Rítmica; Trampolín; Tumbling; Otra
nl: Gymnastiek discipline: Acrobates; Luchtacrobatiek; Aerobics; Turnen; Cheerleading; Algemene training; Ritmische gymnastiek; Trampolinespringen; Tumbling; Overig
th: ประเภทกีฬายิมนาสติก: กายกรรม; กลางอากาศ; แอโรบิก; สากล; เชียร์; การฝึกซ้อมทั่วไป; ลีลา; แทรมโพลีน; ทัมบลิง; อื่นๆ
de: Gymnastikdisziplin: Sportakrobatik; Luftakrobatik; Aerobic; Gerätturnen; Cheerleading; Allgemeines Training; Rhythmische Sportgymnastik; Trampolinturnen; Tumbling; Sonstige
hu: Gimnasztika szakág: Akrobatikus; Légtorna; Aerobik; Szertorna; Cheerleading; Általános edzés; Ritmikus gimnasztika; Gumiasztal; Akrobatikus talajtorna; Egyéb
da: Gymnastikdisciplin: Akrobatik; Aerial; Aerobic; Idrætsgymnastik; Cheerleading; Generel træning; Rytmisk gymnastik; Trampolin; Tumbling; Andet
zh-CN: 体操项目: 技巧体操; 空中体操; 健美操; 竞技体操; 啦啦操; 综合训练; 艺术体操; 蹦床; 翻腾; 其他
cs: Gymnastická disciplína: Akrobatická; Závěsná; Aerobik; Sportovní; Cheerleading; Všeobecná příprava; Moderní; Skoky na trampolíně; Tumbling; Jiná
pl: Dyscyplina gimnastyczna: Akrobatyka; Akrobatyka powietrzna; Aerobik; Gimnastyka sportowa; Cheerleading; Trening ogólny; Gimnastyka artystyczna; Skoki na trampolinie; Skoki na ścieżce; Inne
ko: 체조 종목: 아크로바틱; 에어리얼; 에어로빅; 기계 체조; 치어; 일반 트레이닝; 리듬 체조; 트램펄린; 텀블링; 기타
fi: Voimistelulaji: Akrobatiavoimistelu; Ilma-akrobatia; Kilpa-aerobic; Telinevoimistelu; Cheerleading; Yleisharjoittelu; Rytminen voimistelu; Trampoliinivoimistelu; Tumbling; Muu
pt-BR: Ginástica modalidade: Acrobática; Aérea; Aeróbica; Artística; Cheerleading; Treinamento geral; Rítmica; Trampolim; Tumbling; Outra
zh-TW: 體操項目: 技巧體操; 空中體操; 有氧體操; 競技體操; 競技啦啦隊; 一般訓練; 韻律體操; 彈翻床體操; 翻滾體操; 其他
fr: Discipline de gymnastique: Acrobatique; Aérienne; Aérobique; Artistique; Cheerleading; Entraînement général; Rythmique; Trampoline; Tumbling; Autre
it: Disciplina ginnica: Acrobatica; Aerea; Aerobica; Artistica; Cheerleading; Allenamento generale; Ritmica; Trampolino elastico; Tumbling; Altro
vi: Bộ môn thể dục dụng cụ: Nhào lộn; Trên không; Thể dục nhịp điệu; Thể dục dụng cụ; Hoạt náo; Huấn luyện tổng hợp; Thể dục nghệ thuật; Nhảy bạt lò xo; Nhào lộn trên thảm; Khác
en: Gymnastics discipline: Acrobatic; Aerial; Aerobic; Artistic; Cheer; General Training; Rhythmic; Trampoline; Tumbling; Other
tr: Jimnastik disiplini: Akrobatik; Hava; Aerobik; Artistik; Amigo; Genel antrenman; Ritmik; Trambolin; Tumbling; Diğer
sl-SI: Gimnastična disciplina: Akrobatska; Zračna; Aerobna; Športna gimnastika; Navijaška; Splošni trening; Ritmična; Trampolin; Tumbling; Drugo
sv: Gymnastikdisciplin: Akrobatisk; Luftakrobatik; Aerobisk; Artistisk; Cheerleading; Allmän träning; Rytmisk; Trampolin; Tumbling; Övrigt
el: Γυμναστική κατηγορία: Ακροβατική; Εναέρια; Αεροβική; Ενόργανη; Μαζορέτες; Γενική προπόνηση; Ρυθμική; Τραμπολίνο; Ακροβατικός διάδρομος (Tumbling); Άλλο
ro-RO: Disciplina gimnastică: Acrobatică; Aeriană; Aerobic; Artistică; Majorete; Antrenament general; Ritmică; Trambulină; Tumbling; Altele
bg-BG: Дисциплина в гимнастиката: Акробатика; Въздушна гимнастика; Аеробика; Спортна гимнастика; Мажоретни спортове; Обща тренировка; Художествена гимнастика; Скокове на батут; Акробатична пътека (Тъмблинг); Други
pt-PT: Disciplina de ginástica: Acrobática; Aérea; Aeróbica; Artística; Cheerleading; Treino geral; Rítmica; Trampolim; Tumbling; Outro
hr-HR: Gimnastička disciplina: Akrobatska; Zračna; Aerobik; Sportska; Navijanje; Opći trening; Ritmička; Trampolin; Tumbling; Ostalo
lt-LT: Gimnastikos disciplina: Akrobatinė; Oro; Aerobinė; Sportinė; Palaikymo šokiai; Bendrojo rengimo; Meninė; Batuto; Akrobatinis takelis; Kita
ru: Гимнастическая дисциплина: Акробатическая; Воздушная; Аэробная; Спортивная; Черлидинг; Общая подготовка; Художественная; Прыжки на батуте; Тамблинг (акробатическая дорожка); Другое
ja: 体操競技: アクロバット; エアリアル; エアロビック; 体操競技; チア; 一般トレーニング; 新体操; トランポリン; タンブリング; その他